Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.370

Cooperative farm forestry funds.

The department and Washington State University may each receive funds from the federal government for cooperative work, as authorized by the cooperative forest management act of congress, approved May 18, 1937, and as subsequently authorized by any amendments to or substitutions for that act, for all purposes authorized by those acts, and to disburse the funds in cooperation with the federal government in accordance therewith.

[ 1986 c 100 s 47.]